apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="gallega/sj__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sj</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Attr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Attr"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjan</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjanga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjange</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjangen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjada</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadak</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagá</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagi</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadaga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadakga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagága</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagiga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadage</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadak</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadakge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagáge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagák</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagige</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagik</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadakgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagágen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjadagigen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjajn</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjajnga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjajnge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjajngen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjas</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjasga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjasge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjasgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjaj</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjajga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjajge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dtjajgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjan</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjanga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjange</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjangen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sj</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttja</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjaga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjage</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttjak</l>

    <e lm="gallegasj"><i>gallega</i><par n="gallega/sj__Pron_Indef"/></e>
